Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 27A O.S. 2021, Section 2-6-103.1,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-6-103.1. A. The Department of Environmental Quality
may, to the extent funds are available, contract with the Oklahoma
Rural Water Association and technically qualified vendors, as
defined in the Department’s regulations, for technical assistance
programs to rural water and wastewater system operators throughout
the state. The Department may use a portion of the funds
appropriated for grants and assistance programs to rural water and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4246 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

smal l systems to contract with technically qualified vendors to
provide technical assistance programs to rural water and wastewater
system operators throughout the state. Assistance in response to
drinking water or wastewater emergencies is also eligible. The
Department may contract with other nonprofit entities in addition to
the Oklahoma Rural Water Association or technically qualified
vendors for this purpose if the Department, in its discretion,
determines that those entities can and will provide equally
effective and efficient technical assistance services to rural water
and wastewater system operators throughout the state. Contracts
shall be awarded to the lowest and best, or best value, bidder or
bidders. The exceptions and exemptions to the Oklahoma Central
Purchasing Act shall not apply to the contracts awarded under this
section.
B. The Environmental Quality Board shall promulgate rules and
regulations for the Department of Environmental Quality that define
the technical qualifications of vendors and to carry out the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY
April 9, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4246 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)